Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1325.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 40 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 52DENTAL INSURANCE MEDICAL LOSS RATIOSSec.5201. Definitions.5202. Medical loss ratio report.5203. Regulations.5204. Enforcement.§ 5201. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:123456789101112131415161718 "Dental policy." A health insurance policy that provides dental coverage, whether stand-alone or integrated with other medical or health care coverage."Health insurance policy." As follows:(1) A policy, subscriber contract, certificate or plan issued by a health insurer that provides medical or health care coverage.(2) The term does not include any of the following:(i) An accident only policy.(ii) A credit only policy.(iii) A long-term care policy.(iv) A disability income policy.(v) A specified disease policy.(vi) A Medicare supplement policy.(vii) A TRICARE policy, including a Civilian Health and Medical Program of the Uniformed Services (CHAMPUS) supplement policy.(viii) A fixed indemnity policy.(ix) A hospital indemnity policy.(x) A vision only policy.(xi) A workers' compensation policy.(xii) An automobile medical payment policy under 75 Pa.C.S. (relating to vehicles).(xiii) A homeowner's insurance policy.(xiv) Any other similar policy, other than a dental only policy, providing for limited benefits."Health insurer." An entity licensed by the department that offers, issues or renews an individual or group health insurance policy that is offered or governed under any of the following:(1) The act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as 20250HB1325PN1517 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 The Insurance Company Law of 1921, including section 630 of that act.(2) The act of December 29, 1972 (P.L.1701, No.364), known as the Health Maintenance Organization Act.(3) Chapter 61 (relating to hospital plan corporations) or 63 (relating to professional health services plan corporations).§ 5202. Medical loss ratio report.(a) Annual report required.--No later than the April 30 of the calendar year following the effective date of this subsection and each April 30 thereafter, each health insurer shall submit to the department a medical loss ratio report regarding the dental policies of the health insurer in accordance with this section.(b) Contents.--Each annual medical loss ratio report must:(1) Contain information regarding dental coverage provided by the dental policies for the prior calendar year, organized by market and product type.(2) Be consistent with the terms and requirements of:(i) 42 U.S.C. § 300gg-18 (relating to bringing down the cost of health care coverage).(ii) 45 CFR Pt. 158 (relating to issuer use of premium revenue: reporting and rebate requirements).(3) Provide the information required in the most recent edition of the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services Medical Loss Ratio Annual Reporting Form (CMS-10418).(4) Calculate the medical loss ratio as the percentage of premium dollars spent on patient care as calculated by dividing the numerator by the denominator, where:(i) The numerator, not to include overhead and 20250HB1325PN1517 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 administrative cost expenditures, is the sum of:(A) the amount incurred for clinical dental services provided to enrollees;(B) the amount, not to exceed 5% of net premium revenue, incurred on activities that improve dental care quality; and(C) other incurred claims as defined in 45 CFR 158.140 (relating to reimbursement for clinical services provided to enrollees).(ii) The denominator is the total amount of premium revenue, excluding Federal and State taxes, licensing and regulatory fees paid, community benefit expenditures as defined in 45 CFR 158.162(c) (relating to reporting Federal and State taxes) and limited by 45 CFR 158.162(b)(1)(vii), and any other payments required by Federal law.(5) Be adjusted as necessary to address the particulars of dental coverage.(6) Provide other information as the department may specify in guidance made available on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(c) Administrative cost expenditures.--Unless otherwise determined by the department, an administrative cost expenditure for the purposes of calculating and reporting the medical loss ratio includes, but is not limited to, the following:(1) Financial administration expenses.(2) Marketing and sales expenses.(3) Distribution expenses.(4) Claims operation expenses.(5) Medical administration expenses such as disease management, care management, utilization review and medical 20250HB1325PN1517 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 management activities.(6) Network operation expenses.(7) Charitable expenses.(8) Board, bureau or associate fees.(9) Federal and State tax expenses, including assessments.(10) Payroll expenses.(d) Posting.--The department shall make each annual medical loss ratio report, along with other information provided to the department under this section, available to the public by posting the report and other information on the publicly accessible Internet website of the department.(e) Applicability.--This section shall not apply to:(1) The State program of medical assistance established under the act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code.(2) The program for Comprehensive Health Care for Uninsured Children under Article XXIII-A of the act of May 17, 1921 (P.L.682, No.284), known as The Insurance Company Law of 1921.(3) Other Commonwealth-sponsored health programs.§ 5203. Regulations.The department may promulgate regulations as necessary and appropriate to carry out the provisions of this chapter.§ 5204. Enforcement.(a) Penalties.--Upon satisfactory evidence of a violation of this chapter by a health insurer, the Insurance Commissioner may assess any of the following administrative penalties on the health insurer:(1) Suspend, revoke or refuse to renew the license of 20250HB1325PN1517 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the health insurer.(2) Enter a cease and desist order.(3) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $5,000 for each action in violation of this chapter.(4) Impose a civil penalty of not more than $10,000 for each action in willful violation of this chapter.(b) Limitation.--Penalties imposed against a health insurer under this section may not exceed $500,000 in the aggregate during a single calendar year.(c) Nonexclusive remedies.--(1) The enforcement remedies imposed under this section are in addition to any other remedies or penalties that may be imposed under any other applicable law of this Commonwealth, including the act of July 22, 1974 (P.L.589, No.205), known as the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(2) A violation of this chapter by a health insurer shall be deemed to be an unfair method of competition and an unfair or deceptive act or practice under the Unfair Insurance Practices Act.(d) Administrative procedures.--The administrative provisions of this section shall be subject to 2 Pa.C.S. Chs. 5 Subch. A (relating to practice and procedure of Commonwealth agencies) and 7 Subch. A (relating to judicial review of Commonwealth agency action).Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB1325PN1517 - 6 - 12345678910111213141516171819202122232425